Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2680.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; FENCING CONSORTIUM.new text end new text begin $3,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for a grant to the Fencing Consortium for acquisition of anti-scale fencing, pedestrian doors, and vehicle gates for local government facilities statewide that are members of the consortium to improve equitable access to a de-escalation and safety tool. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end